Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202637-327.04
Game and Parks Commission Educational Fund; created; use; investment.

The Game and Parks Commission Educational Fund is created. The fund shall consist of money credited pursuant to sections 37-327.05 and 60-3,163.02, any gifts, grants, bequests, or other contributions to such fund, and any other money as determined by the Legislature. The commission shall use the fund to provide youth education programs relating to wildlife conservation practices. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2016, LB474, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB398, § 4;

Laws 2026, LB979, § 5.
July 18, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.